Florida, session 2026, SB490.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 18 19 Section 1.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 20 119.0712, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 21 119.0712âExecutive branch agency-specific exemptions from 22 inspection or copying of public records.â 23 (2)âDEPARTMENT OF HIGHWAY SAFETY AND MOTOR VEHICLES.â 24 (c)âE-mail addresses collected by the Department of Highway 25 Safety and Motor Vehicles pursuant to s. 319.40(3), s. 26 320.95(2), or s. 322.08(10), or s. 328.30 are exempt from s. 27 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. This 28 exemption applies retroactively. This paragraph is subject to 29 the Open Government Sunset Review Act in accordance with s. 30 119.15 and shall stand repealed on October 2, 2031, unless 31 reviewed and saved from repeal through reenactment by the 32 Legislature. 33 Section 2.âThe Legislature finds that it is a public 34 necessity that e-mail addresses collected by the Department of 35 Highway Safety and Motor Vehicles for the use of e-mail in lieu 36 of the United States Postal Service as a method of notification 37 be made exempt from s. 119.07(1), Florida Statutes, and s. 38 24(a), Article I of the State Constitution. Sections 320.95(2) 39 and 322.08(10), Florida Statutes, authorize the department to 40 collect e-mail addresses and use e-mail in lieu of the United 41 States Postal Service to provide renewal notices related to 42 motor vehicle license plates, driver licenses, and 43 identification cards. The department is also authorized to 44 collect e-mail addresses and use e-mail to provide renewal 45 notices related to vessel registrations pursuant to s. 46 328.30(3), Florida Statutes. SB 488 expands the circumstances in 47 which e-mail may be used in lieu of the United States Postal 48 Service by authorizing e-mail to be used as a method of 49 notification for various notices and orders issued by the 50 department in addition to renewal notices, including, but not 51 limited to, notices related to driver licenses, identification 52 cards, motor vehicle registrations, vessel registrations, and 53 orders to revoke, cancel, or suspend driver licenses. The 54 departmentâs use of e-mail as a method for corresponding with 55 customers has steadily increased in recent decades. E-mail 56 addresses are unique to each individual and, when combined with 57 other personal identifying information, can be used for identity 58 theft, consumer scams, unwanted solicitations, or other invasive 59 contacts. The public availability of personal e-mail addresses 60 puts the departmentâs customers at increased risk of these 61 problems. Such risks may be significantly limited by permitting 62 the department to keep customer e-mail addresses exempt. The 63 Legislature finds that these risks to consumers outweigh the 64 stateâs public policy favoring open government. 65 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect on the same date that 66 SB 488 or similar legislation takes effect, if such legislation 67 is adopted in the same legislative session or an extension 68 thereof and becomes a law.